browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2549 Y 1
SFX 2549 l nas l
SFX 4128 Y 1
SFX 4128 n schai n
SFX 3656 Y 1
SFX 3656 a usas a
SFX 3063 Y 1
SFX 3063 n ssem n
SFX 2497 Y 1
SFX 2497 n rtavas n
SFX 1075 Y 1
SFX 1075 a entia a
SFX 2654 Y 1
SFX 2654 a iglia a
SFX 3841 Y 1
SFX 3841 n tschassas n
SFX 2900 Y 1
SFX 2900 t una t
SFX 2098 Y 1
SFX 2098 a seschias a
SFX 4573 Y 1
SFX 4573 a ifitgassas a
SFX 3840 Y 1
SFX 3840 r tschassas r
SFX 1638 Y 1
SFX 1638 a ografia a
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 c seschias c
SFX 633 Y 1
SFX 633 a usa a
SFX 2496 Y 1
SFX 2496 n rtia n
SFX 2511 Y 1
SFX 2511 n rtada n
SFX 3083 Y 1
SFX 3083 c sant c
SFX 1168 Y 1
SFX 1168 a iez a
SFX 3315 Y 1
SFX 3315 a idava a
SFX 2460 Y 1
SFX 2460 n seschias n
SFX 1164 Y 1
SFX 1164 a inai a
SFX 2896 Y 1
SFX 2896 o urna o
SFX 3613 Y 1
SFX 3613 t ziuneschian t
SFX 2883 Y 1
SFX 2883 s vel s
SFX 3644 Y 1
SFX 3644 t vel t
SFX 3260 Y 1
SFX 3260 a isaziun a
SFX 3657 Y 1
SFX 3657 s usa s
SFX 2454 Y 1
SFX 2454 r ssada r
SFX 2103 Y 1
SFX 2103 a sescha a
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 a ian a
SFX 3097 Y 1
SFX 3097 n rmeschas n
SFX 274 Y 1
SFX 274 c sescha c
SFX 2614 Y 1
SFX 2614 a ir a
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 a er a
SFX 3411 Y 1
SFX 3411 c er c
SFX 47 Y 1
SFX 47 a ond a
SFX 3738 Y 1
SFX 3738 i unai i
SFX 3701 Y 1
SFX 3701 i unava i
SFX 3410 Y 1
SFX 3410 d er d
SFX 3624 Y 1
SFX 3624 t ziunai t
SFX 4533 Y 1
SFX 4533 g ir g
SFX 2542 Y 1
SFX 2542 e ond e
SFX 2465 Y 1
SFX 2465 n sescha n
SFX 943 Y 1
SFX 943 i ond i
SFX 624 Y 1
SFX 624 a ezza a
SFX 4470 Y 1
SFX 4470 a ius a
SFX 1130 Y 1
SFX 1130 m ond m
SFX 1434 Y 1
SFX 1434 c tgeschia c
SFX 1129 Y 1
SFX 1129 n ond n
SFX 3023 Y 1
SFX 3023 a tad a
SFX 4466 Y 1
SFX 4466 a iziun a
SFX 2417 Y 1
SFX 2417 c tad c
SFX 4152 Y 1
SFX 4152 l rnais l
SFX 424 Y 1
SFX 424 a ent a
SFX 3610 Y 1
SFX 3610 t ziunesch t
SFX 4456 Y 1
SFX 4456 i lads i
SFX 3976 Y 1
SFX 3976 n tad n
SFX 3858 Y 1
SFX 3858 n tschads n
SFX 2889 Y 1
SFX 2889 a van a
SFX 1680 Y 1
SFX 1680 a isavas a
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 a hesch a
SFX 4589 Y 1
SFX 4589 a ider a
SFX 2661 Y 1
SFX 2661 a idar a
SFX 3830 Y 1
SFX 3830 n tschian n
SFX 2112 Y 1
SFX 2112 a savas a
SFX 3857 Y 1
SFX 3857 r tschads r
SFX 276 Y 1
SFX 276 c savas c
SFX 3866 Y 1
SFX 3866 r tori r
SFX 4563 Y 1
SFX 4563 a ifitgeschias a
SFX 3829 Y 1
SFX 3829 r tschian r
SFX 4890 Y 1
SFX 4890 a clada a
SFX 3825 Y 1
SFX 3825 n tschond n
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 a ular a
SFX 2362 Y 1
SFX 2362 i van i
SFX 2888 Y 1
SFX 2888 l van l
SFX 2873 Y 1
SFX 2873 t ziada t
SFX 1286 Y 1
SFX 1286 a ià a
SFX 3824 Y 1
SFX 3824 r tschond r
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 r ziuns r
SFX 473 Y 1
SFX 473 t ziuns t
SFX 3469 Y 1
SFX 3469 a clas a
SFX 2479 Y 1
SFX 2479 n savas n
SFX 1888 Y 1
SFX 1888 a inescha a
SFX 1155 Y 1
SFX 1155 a inavas a
SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 r van r
SFX 2023 Y 1
SFX 2023 s van s
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 t van t
SFX 4745 Y 1
SFX 4745 a ereschias a
SFX 4561 Y 1
SFX 4561 a ign a
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 a egia a
SFX 2498 Y 1
SFX 2498 n rtavan n
SFX 1886 Y 1
SFX 1886 a ineschas a
SFX 2374 Y 1
SFX 2374 a ura a
SFX 2184 Y 1
SFX 2184 a itscha a
SFX 1844 Y 1
SFX 1844 a or a
SFX 4452 Y 1
SFX 4452 i lais i
SFX 3852 Y 1
SFX 3852 n tschais n
SFX 2473 Y 1
SFX 2473 g schava g
SFX 1439 Y 1
SFX 1439 c tgavas c
SFX 3843 Y 1
SFX 3843 n tschassan n
SFX 1016 Y 1
SFX 1016 a entada a
SFX 1096 Y 1
SFX 1096 a ca a
SFX 3851 Y 1
SFX 3851 r tschais r
SFX 2099 Y 1
SFX 2099 a seschian a
SFX 4574 Y 1
SFX 4574 a ifitgassan a
SFX 3842 Y 1
SFX 3842 r tschassan r
SFX 3662 Y 1
SFX 3662 i ura i
SFX 269 Y 1
SFX 269 c seschian c
SFX 4112 Y 1
SFX 4112 n schava n
SFX 3609 Y 1
SFX 3609 t ziunond t
SFX 1380 Y 1
SFX 1380 a iavas a
SFX 2203 Y 1
SFX 2203 a iss a
SFX 91 Y 1
SFX 91 a eschas a
SFX 4135 Y 1
SFX 4135 d scha d
SFX 3742 Y 1
SFX 3742 i unadas i
SFX 3660 Y 1
SFX 3660 o ura o
SFX 3850 Y 1
SFX 3850 m tscha m
SFX 2920 Y 1
SFX 2920 a ulassas a
SFX 2704 Y 1
SFX 2704 d eschas d
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 a egiavas a
SFX 1809 Y 1
SFX 1809 n tscha n
SFX 2109 Y 1
SFX 2109 g scha g
SFX 4767 Y 1
SFX 4767 a ena a
SFX 4704 Y 1
SFX 4704 a ettai a
SFX 4170 Y 1
SFX 4170 o rim o
SFX 3637 Y 1
SFX 3637 t vì t
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 a eva a
SFX 1787 Y 1
SFX 1787 s ura s
SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 a era a
SFX 3057 Y 1
SFX 3057 d ssur d
SFX 2461 Y 1
SFX 2461 n seschian n
SFX 2396 Y 1
SFX 2396 r tscha r
SFX 3844 Y 1
SFX 3844 s tscha s
SFX 388 Y 1
SFX 388 l scha l
SFX 4123 Y 1
SFX 4123 m scha m
SFX 3313 Y 1
SFX 3313 a idavas a
SFX 858 Y 1
SFX 858 n scha n
SFX 1692 Y 1
SFX 1692 a isà a
SFX 3082 Y 1
SFX 3082 p scha p
SFX 4355 Y 1
SFX 4355 l nada l
SFX 3625 Y 1
SFX 3625 t ziunais t
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 r scha r
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 a da a
SFX 1564 Y 1
SFX 1564 c da c
SFX 882 Y 1
SFX 882 t zia t
SFX 2158 Y 1
SFX 2158 l ntadas l
SFX 3635 Y 1
SFX 3635 t vras t
SFX 4176 Y 1
SFX 4176 n ria n
SFX 3100 Y 1
SFX 3100 n rma n
SFX 1284 Y 1
SFX 1284 a iai a
SFX 3098 Y 1
SFX 3098 n rmeschan n
SFX 3061 Y 1
SFX 3061 r ssia r
SFX 1904 Y 1
SFX 1904 a ieschia a
SFX 2275 Y 1
SFX 2275 a fitgai a
SFX 684 Y 1
SFX 684 a im a
SFX 3138 Y 1
SFX 3138 i nzas i
SFX 2274 Y 1
SFX 2274 c fitgai c
SFX 4748 Y 1
SFX 4748 a ereschas a
SFX 1720 Y 1
SFX 1720 a heschia a
SFX 2426 Y 1
SFX 2426 l stas l
SFX 959 Y 1
SFX 959 a itsch a
SFX 3633 Y 1
SFX 3633 t zada t
SFX 1604 Y 1
SFX 1604 n stas n
SFX 1676 Y 1
SFX 1676 a iun a
SFX 3628 Y 1
SFX 3628 t ziunadas t
SFX 3094 Y 1
SFX 3094 n rmeschias n
SFX 3996 Y 1
SFX 3996 r stas r
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 a ur a
SFX 3839 Y 1
SFX 3839 n tschass n
SFX 3233 Y 1
SFX 3233 i lass i
SFX 2694 Y 1
SFX 2694 a fitgeschia a
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 a ia a
SFX 3838 Y 1
SFX 3838 r tschass r
SFX 2860 Y 1
SFX 2860 t zieschas t
SFX 2250 Y 1
SFX 2250 c fitgeschia c
SFX 4151 Y 1
SFX 4151 l rna l
SFX 4888 Y 1
SFX 4888 a cladas a
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 i ur i
SFX 3090 Y 1
SFX 3090 n rra n
SFX 1691 Y 1
SFX 1691 a isada a
SFX 4560 Y 1
SFX 4560 a igna a
SFX 1681 Y 1
SFX 1681 a isavan a
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 o ur o
SFX 2868 Y 1
SFX 2868 t ziassas t
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 a savan a
SFX 804 Y 1
SFX 804 s ur s
SFX 3392 Y 1
SFX 3392 a ert a
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 c savan c
SFX 4564 Y 1
SFX 4564 a ifitgeschian a
SFX 1688 Y 1
SFX 1688 a isai a
SFX 3500 Y 1
SFX 3500 a ch a
SFX 2200 Y 1
SFX 2200 a ists a
SFX 4162 Y 1
SFX 4162 l rmà l
SFX 1445 Y 1
SFX 1445 c tgar c
SFX 3620 Y 1
SFX 3620 t ziunass t
SFX 2544 Y 1
SFX 2544 a ografic a
SFX 1879 Y 1
SFX 1879 a iseschas a
SFX 4161 Y 1
SFX 4161 n rmà n
SFX 1274 Y 1
SFX 1274 a istic a
SFX 2499 Y 1
SFX 2499 n rtava n
SFX 2480 Y 1
SFX 2480 n savan n
SFX 1156 Y 1
SFX 1156 a inavan a
SFX 4694 Y 1
SFX 4694 a fa a
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 a na a
SFX 1859 Y 1
SFX 1859 c na c
SFX 620 Y 1
SFX 620 i nts i
SFX 4746 Y 1
SFX 4746 a ereschian a
SFX 4402 Y 1
SFX 4402 i lond i
SFX 2281 Y 1
SFX 2281 a fitgada a
SFX 1479 Y 1
SFX 1479 l nts l
SFX 3947 Y 1
SFX 3947 s tent s
SFX 2280 Y 1
SFX 2280 c fitgada c
SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 i ja i
SFX 1261 Y 1
SFX 1261 a om a
SFX 2339 Y 1
SFX 2339 t ziala t
SFX 4453 Y 1
SFX 4453 i lain i
SFX 3855 Y 1
SFX 3855 n tschain n
SFX 1440 Y 1
SFX 1440 c tgavan c
SFX 3941 Y 1
SFX 3941 r tgar r
SFX 1857 Y 1
SFX 1857 l na l
SFX 3940 Y 1
SFX 3940 s tgar s
SFX 3190 Y 1
SFX 3190 m na m
SFX 2283 Y 1
SFX 2283 a fitgà a
SFX 3854 Y 1
SFX 3854 r tschain r
SFX 2282 Y 1
SFX 2282 c fitgà c
SFX 3337 Y 1
SFX 3337 c gnias c
SFX 4649 Y 1
SFX 4649 d gnias d
SFX 3129 Y 1
SFX 3129 i om i
SFX 1381 Y 1
SFX 1381 a iavan a
SFX 2440 Y 1
SFX 2440 r ssava r
SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92 a eschan a
SFX 2921 Y 1
SFX 2921 a ulassan a
SFX 2705 Y 1
SFX 2705 d eschan d
SFX 971 Y 1
SFX 971 a egiavan a
SFX 1813 Y 1
SFX 1813 r tivs r
SFX 3353 Y 1
SFX 3353 a ga a
SFX 3255 Y 1
SFX 3255 a it a
SFX 364 Y 1
SFX 364 a et a
SFX 2689 Y 1
SFX 2689 c ga c
SFX 4148 Y 1
SFX 4148 l rta l
SFX 3314 Y 1
SFX 3314 a idavan a
SFX 4679 Y 1
SFX 4679 f ga f
SFX 3093 Y 1
SFX 3093 n rmesch n
SFX 1612 Y 1
SFX 1612 n rta n
SFX 4582 Y 1
SFX 4582 a ifitgadas a
SFX 1682 Y 1
SFX 1682 a isava a
SFX 829 Y 1
SFX 829 a ella a
SFX 3626 Y 1
SFX 3626 t ziunain t
SFX 3971 Y 1
SFX 3971 m tar m
SFX 1761 Y 1
SFX 1761 a bla a
SFX 2486 Y 1
SFX 2486 m sa m
SFX 4137 Y 1
SFX 4137 n sa n
SFX 1109 Y 1
SFX 1109 r tura r
