browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
coda/9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,54,66,89,90,91,92,93,111,112,3302,4562,4563,4564,4565,4566,4567,4568,4569,4570,4571,4572,4573,4574,4575,4576,4577,4578,4579,4580,4582,4583,4584
collect/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,70,86,135,141,178,181,196,400,426,473,957,958,1773,2000,2598,2852,3609,3610,3611,3612,3613,3614,3615,3616,3617,3618,3619,3620,3621,3622,3624,3625,3626,3627,3628
concorde/2542
consola/1,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,54,66,75,89,90,91,92,93,111,112,321,2661,2664,2665,2666,3305,3313,3314,3315,3316,3317,3318,3319,3320,4592,4593
distant/2338,2854,2865,2873
electric/1,3,5,64,83,88,221,256,258,259,260,267,268,269,270,272,273,274,276,277,278,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,450,484,2246,2248,2249,2250,2252,2253,2254,2256,2258,2260,2262,2263,2265,2268,2270,2272,2274,2276,2278,2280,2282,2285
extrada/4466
furm/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,68,70,77,136,141,156,188,295,298,721,1130,2234,3321
grippa/77,79,255,633,1371,3656
guerra/1,2654,4552
ilaric/5,2417
impon/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,57,58,59,71,72,73,74,86,135,145,147,148,149,152,372,650,913,1344,1379,1604,1607,1612,1832,2127,2492,2494,2495,2496,2497,2498,2499,2500,2501,2502,2503,2504,2505,2506,2507,2508,2509,2510,2511,2667,3089,4146,4149,4201
interrogar/193,3866
istoric/1,3,5,64,81,83,95,197,221,334,2672,3083
lega/9,10,11,12,15,22,24,45,47,53,56,62,63,174,180,185,263,287,288,293,305,311,312,536,783,912,1282,1283,1284,1550,1676,1718,1719,1720,1721,1722,1723,1724,3020,3328
mamma/1,56,79,186,189,251,1638,2136
metallic/1,5,256,258,259,260,267,276,277,280,281,282,283,285,477,3411
Nizza/874
organ/1,67,88,95,99,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,134,354,370,450,575,1007,1473,1679,2606,3063
peis/2883
persuna/785,3302,4562,4570,4571,4572,4573,4574,4575,4576,4577,4578,4579,4580,4582,4583,4584
preoccupai/1,2,108,2090,2361,2362,2447
raffa/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,53,54,62,63,75,84,250,255,1052,1053,1154,1155,1156,1157,1158,1159,1160,1161,1162,1163,1164,1165,1166,1885,1886,1887,1888,1889,2222,2223
regl/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,70,80,105,153,154,315,1101,1857,2549,3192,4355
renovar/9,184,193
repar/3,4,5,6,7,8,20,25,26,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,56,60,68,70,82,138,140,141,142,154,159,164,173,175,225,401,402,419,429,430,431,432,643,853,885,886,887,1115,2320,2435,2439,2440,2441,2442,2443,2444,2445,2446,2449,2450,2451,2452,2453,2454,2996,3059,3061,3062,3869
resolut/5,81,86,132,162,178,196,473
rugai/1,2,2090,2361,2362,2447,4402,4445,4446,4448,4449,4450,4452,4453,4455,4456,4459,4460
rugn/5,98,1129
satiglia/624
s'auza/2,11,13,14,18,19,47,53,63
scrutini/943
scurtgada/45
s'emburgaisescha/2,63
sgrufla/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,53,54,62,63,174,1168
snua/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,66,89,90,91,92,93,111,112,174,245,286,536,597,659,1050,1541,1674,2182,2201,2202,2203,2597,2614,2621
specific/1,3,5,68,81,132,1431,1432,1433,1434,1436,1437,1438,1439,1440,1441,1442,1443,1444,1445,1446,1447,1448,1449,1450,1451,1452
splat/4,60,82,138,140,142,150,157,158,159,160,161,163,164,166,167,168,169,170,171,173,175,1417,2900,2901
splattin/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,1809,2054,3825,3827,3830,3831,3833,3836,3837,3839,3841,3843,3845,3848,3849,3852,3855,3856,3858,3860,3862
sturn/1,3,5,9,10,15,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,71,72,73,74,86,105,132,135,145,147,148,149,151,152,1873,2234,4124,4126,4128
substanza/1,1279,1281,4470
sustrag/4533
tend/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,57,58,59,71,72,73,74,83,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,309,313,1244,1561,2418,3410,4085,4107,4118,4135,4753
tuba/2376
tuma/1844
victima/1,3260
viola/1,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,54,66,89,90,91,92,93,111,112,185,186,189,364,424,625,665,872,1303,2730
zotla/1,633
